Connecticut, session 2026, HB05212.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Periodic payment" means a payment made in an amount
sufficient to cover principal, interest and, if applicable, escrow for a
given billing cycle;
(2) "Partial payment" means a payment made in an amount less than
a periodic payment; and
(3) "Residential mortgage loan" means any loan that is (A) issued on
or after October 1, 2026, by a Connecticut bank or a Connecticut credit
union, as such terms are defined in section 36a-2 of the general statutes,
(B) primarily for personal, family or household use, and (C) secured by
a mortgage, deed of trust or other equivalent consensual security
interest on a dwelling or residential real estate upon which is
constructed or intended to be constructed a dwelling.
LCO No. 1608 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5212
(b) A periodic payment or a partial payment on a residential
mortgage loan shall be accepted and credited, or treated as credited, in
accordance with the terms of the residential mortgage loan, on the
business day on which the payment is received, provided (1) the
payment is made where the borrower has been instructed in writing to
make payments on such loan, and (2) the borrower has provided
sufficient information in order for the recipient of such payment to
identify and credit the relevant mortgage account.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section